Hawaii statutes.
PART 3.
GENERAL OBLIGATION AND CONSTRUCTION OF CONTRACT

Law Journals and Reviews

Products Liability in Hawaii. 14 HBJ 127.

§490:2-301 General obligation of parties.
The obligation of the seller is to transfer and deliver and that of the buyer
is to accept and pay in accordance with the contract. [L 1965, c 208, §2-301;
HRS §490:2-301]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next